Tennessee, session 114, HB0727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-1203, is amended by adding
the following to the end of the section:
The department shall report on the effectiveness of the drug testing program to such
committees of the senate and the house of representatives by December 1 of each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0727
001760
- 1 -